Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-1,101.02
Records.

Every person who keeps, sells, or uses a commercial weighing and measuring device shall keep and make available for examination by the department for a period of three years at a minimum the following records:

(1) All invoices generated from a sale from bulk;

(2) Bills of lading, invoices, or other pertinent data relating to commodities bought or sold; and

(3) Any other information that would verify accurate quantity determinations by weight, measure, or count.

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 33.